pt-BR: Capota flexível tipo de instalação: Por grampo; Requer perfuração; Sem perfuração; Substituição original (OEM); Engate rápido; Temporária/com alças; Outro
sk-SK: Typ montáže mäkkej strechy: Na svorky; Vyžaduje sa vŕtanie; Bez vŕtania; OEM náhrada; Rýchloupínanie; Dočasné/na popruhy; Iný
ru: Тип установки мягкого верха: На зажимах; Требуется сверление; Без сверления; Замена OEM; Быстросъёмное; Временное/на ремнях; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de instalare a plafonului decapotabil: Prindere cu cleme; Necesită găurire; Fără găurire; Înlocuire OEM; Eliberare rapidă; Temporar/prindere cu chingi; Altele
es: Tipo de instalación de techo blando: Con abrazadera; Requiere perforación; Sin perforación; Reemplazo OEM; Liberación rápida; Temporal o con correa; Otro
it: Tipo di installazione della capote morbida: A morsetto; Foratura richiesta; Senza foratura; Ricambio OEM; A sgancio rapido; Temporanea/con cinghie; Altro
de: Montageart des Verdecks: Zum Anklemmen; Bohren erforderlich; Ohne Bohren; OEM-Ersatz; Schnellverschluss; Temporär/Zum Festgurten; Andere
da: Installationstype for softtop: Fastspændt (med klemmer); Boring påkrævet; Uden boring; OEM-udskiftning; Kviklås; Midlertidig/med stropper; Andet
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на мек покрив: Със скоби; Изисква пробиване; Без пробиване; OEM заместител; Бързо освобождаване; Временен/с ремъци; Друго
zh-CN: 软顶安装类型: 夹钳式; 需要打孔; 免打孔; 原厂替换; 快拆式; 临时/绑带式; 其他
nl: Softtop installatietype: Klembevestiging; Boren vereist; Zonder boren; OEM-vervanging; Quick-release; Tijdelijk/met riemen; Anders
cs: Typ instalace měkké střechy: Na svorky; Vyžaduje vrtání; Bez vrtání; Náhrada OEM; Rychloupínací; Dočasný / na popruhy; Jiné
zh-TW: 軟頂安裝類型: 夾具安裝; 需鑽孔; 免鑽孔; OEM 替換件; 快拆式; 臨時/綁帶式; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje mekog krova: Stezaljka; Potrebno bušenje; Bez bušenja; Zamjena za OEM; Brzo otpuštanje; Privremeno / s trakama; Ostalo
sv: Sufflett Installationstyp: Fastklämd; Kräver borrning; Ingen borrning; OEM-ersättning; Snabbkoppling; Tillfällig/fastspänd; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งหลังคาผ้าใบ: แบบหนีบ; ต้องเจาะ; ไม่ต้องเจาะ; ชิ้นส่วนทดแทน OEM; ปลดเร็ว; ชั่วคราว/แบบสายรัด; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve mehke strehe: Na sponke; Potrebno vrtanje; Brez vrtanja; Zamenjava originalne opreme (OEM); Hitra sprostitev; Začasno/s trakovi; Drugo
ko: 소프트탑 설치 유형: 클램프온; 드릴 필요; 무타공; OEM 교체; 퀵 릴리스; 임시/스트랩온; 기타
fr: Type d’installation de la capote souple: À pincer; Perçage requis; Sans perçage; Pièce de rechange OEM; À libération rapide; Temporaire/à sangles; Autre
ja: ソフトトップ取付タイプ: クランプオン; 穴あけ必要; 穴あけ不要; 純正交換; クイックリリース; 一時的 / ストラップ留め; その他
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης κουκούλας: Με σφιγκτήρα; Απαιτείται διάτρηση; Χωρίς διάτρηση; Ανταλλακτικό OEM; Ταχείας απασφάλισης; Προσωρινή/Με ιμάντες; Άλλο
en: Soft top installation type: Clamp-on; Drill required; No-drill; OEM replacement; Quick release; Temporary/strap-on; Other
pl: Typ montażu miękkiego dachu: Na zaciski; Wymagane wiercenie; Bez wiercenia; Zamiennik OEM; Szybki montaż; Tymczasowy / na paski; Inne
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt mui mềm: Kẹp chặt; Cần khoan; Không cần khoan; Thay thế OEM; Tháo lắp nhanh; Tạm thời/dùng dây đai; Khác
hu: Vászontető szerelési típusa: Bilincses; Fúrást igényel; Nem igényel fúrást; Gyári (OEM) cserealkatrész; Gyorskioldós; Ideiglenes / Szíjas; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação da capota: Fixação por grampos; Requer perfuração; Sem perfuração; Substituição OEM; Libertação rápida; Temporário/fixação por alças; Outro
nb: Kalesjemontering: Klemmes på; Krever boring; Uten boring; OEM-erstatning; Hurtigkobling; Midlertidig/stroppes på; Annet
fi: Kangaskaton asennustyyppi: Puristettava; Vaatii poraamista; Ei porausta; OEM-varaosa; Pikakiinnitys; Tilapäinen/hihnoilla kiinnitettävä; Muu
tr: Araç üstü açılır tavan montaj tipi: Kelepçeli; Delme gerektirir; Delme gerektirmez; OEM değişimi; Çabuk açılır; Geçici/kayışlı; Diğer
lt-LT: Minkšto stogo montavimo tipas: Prispaudžiamas; Reikia gręžti; Nereikia gręžti; OEM pakaitalas; Greitai nuimamas; Laikinas / tvirtinamas dirželiais; Kita